Massachusetts, session 194th, H2573.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Definitions
(a) "Local and State Law Enforcement Agency" shall mean any police department,
sheriff's office, or other law enforcement entity established by the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts or any of its political subdivisions.
(b) "ICE" shall refer to U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement, an agency within
the Department of Homeland Security responsible for immigration enforcement.
(c) "Immigration Detainer" shall mean a request by ICE to a local or state law
enforcement agency to hold an individual believed to be subject to removal from the United
States for an additional period beyond when they would otherwise be released from custody.
Section 2. Mandatory Cooperation
of 3

(a) All local and state law enforcement agencies shall:
(1) Honor and comply with ICE immigration detainers, which include requests to notify
ICE of the release of an individual and to maintain custody of such individuals for up to 48 hours
beyond the time they would otherwise be released to facilitate ICE's assumption of custody.
(2) Share pertinent information with ICE regarding the immigration or citizenship status
of any individual in their custody, when such information is requested by ICE in the performance
of its duties.
(3) Participate in joint task forces with ICE when requested for operations aimed at
immigration enforcement, provided that such participation does not impede the primary duties of
local law enforcement.
(b) Exceptions:
(1) This cooperation shall not extend to situations where state or federal law explicitly
prohibits such actions or where the cooperation would contravene an individual's constitutional
rights.
(2) Local and state law enforcement may decline to detain an individual solely on an ICE
detainer if no probable cause exists for a criminal charge independent of immigration status.
Section 3. Training and Resources
(a) The Peace Officers Standards and Training Commission shall develop training
programs for local and state law enforcement on the legal obligations and procedures for
cooperation with ICE.
of 3

(b) The Commonwealth shall provide resources or seek federal assistance to support local
agencies in complying with these requirements, including the costs associated with holding
individuals pursuant to ICE detainers.
Section 4. Reporting
(a) Each local and state law enforcement agency shall report annually to the Secretary of
Public Safety and Security on:
(1) The number of ICE detainers received and honored.
(2) The number of individuals transferred to ICE custody.
(3) Any significant issues or legal challenges encountered in the process of cooperation.
(b) The Secretary shall compile these reports and submit an annual summary to the
Governor and the General Court.
Section 5. Enforcement
(a) Failure by a local or state law enforcement agency to comply with this act may result
in:
(1) Review by the Attorney General of Massachusetts, who may seek judicial remedies to
enforce compliance.
(2) Potential withholding of state funding or grants related to law enforcement activities
of 3